Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202518-2147
Ad valorem tax; division authorized; limitations; qualified allocation plan.

(1) Any redevelopment plan as originally approved or as later modified pursuant to section 18-2117 may contain a provision that any ad valorem tax levied upon real property, or any portion thereof, in a redevelopment project for the benefit of any public body shall be divided, for the applicable period described in subsection (4) of this section, as follows:

(a) That portion of the ad valorem tax which is produced by the levy at the rate fixed each year by or for each such public body upon the redevelopment project valuation shall be paid into the funds of each such public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or for the body. When there is not a redevelopment project valuation on a parcel or parcels, the county assessor shall determine the redevelopment project valuation based upon the fair market valuation of the parcel or parcels as of January 1 of the year prior to the year that the ad valorem taxes are to be divided. The county assessor shall provide written notice of the redevelopment project valuation to the authority as defined in section 18-2103 and the owner. The authority or owner may protest the valuation to the county board of equalization within thirty days after the date of the valuation notice. All provisions of section 77-1502 except dates for filing of a protest, the period for hearing protests, and the date for mailing notice of the county board of equalization's decision are applicable to any protest filed pursuant to this section. The county board of equalization shall decide any protest filed pursuant to this section within thirty days after the filing of the protest. The county clerk shall mail a copy of the decision made by the county board of equalization on protests pursuant to this section to the authority or owner within seven days after the board's decision. Any decision of the county board of equalization may be appealed to the Tax Equalization and Review Commission, in accordance with section 77-5013, within thirty days after the date of the decision;

(b) That portion of the ad valorem tax on real property, as provided in the redevelopment contract, bond resolution, or redevelopment plan, as applicable, in the redevelopment project in excess of such amount, if any, shall be allocated to and, when collected, paid into a special fund of the authority to be used solely to pay the principal of, the interest on, and any premiums due in connection with the bonds of, loans, notes, or advances of money to, or indebtedness incurred by, whether funded, refunded, assumed, or otherwise, such authority for financing or refinancing, in whole or in part, the redevelopment project. When such bonds, loans, notes, advances of money, or indebtedness, including interest and premiums due, have been paid, the authority shall so notify the county assessor and county treasurer and all ad valorem taxes upon taxable real property in such a redevelopment project shall be paid into the funds of the respective public bodies. An authority may use a single fund for purposes of this subdivision for all redevelopment projects or may use a separate fund for each redevelopment project; and

(c) Any interest and penalties due for delinquent taxes shall be paid into the funds of each public body in the same proportion as are all other taxes collected by or for the public body.

(2) To the extent that a redevelopment plan authorizes the division of ad valorem taxes levied upon only a portion of the real property included in such redevelopment plan, any improvements funded by such division of taxes shall be related to the redevelopment plan that authorized such division of taxes.

(3)(a) For any redevelopment plan located in a city of the metropolitan class that includes a division of taxes, as provided in this section, that produces, in whole or in part, funds to be used directly or indirectly for (i) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of housing for households with annual incomes below the area median income for households and located within six hundred yards of a public passenger streetcar or (ii) new construction, rehabilitation, or acquisition of single-family housing or condominium housing used as primary residences for individuals with annual incomes below the area median income for individuals, such housing shall be deemed related to the redevelopment plan that authorized such division of taxes regardless of whether such housing is or will be located on real property within such redevelopment plan, as long as such housing supports activities occurring on or identified in such redevelopment plan.

(b) During each fiscal year in which the funds described in subdivision (a) of this subsection are available, the authority and city shall make best efforts to allocate not less than thirty percent of such funds to single-family housing deemed related to the redevelopment plan described under such subdivision.

(c) In selecting projects to receive funding, the authority and city shall develop a qualified allocation plan and give first priority to financially viable projects that serve the lowest income occupants for the longest period of time.

(4)(a) For any redevelopment plan for which more than fifty percent of the property in the redevelopment project area has been declared an extremely blighted area in accordance with section 18-2101.02, ad valorem taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed twenty years after the effective date as identified in the project redevelopment contract or in the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 18-2124.

(b) For all other redevelopment plans, ad valorem taxes shall be divided for a period not to exceed fifteen years after the effective date as identified in the project redevelopment contract, in the resolution of the authority authorizing the issuance of bonds pursuant to section 18-2124, or in the redevelopment plan, whichever is applicable.

(5) The effective date of a provision dividing ad valorem taxes as provided in subsection (4) of this section shall not occur until such time as the real property in the redevelopment project is within the corporate boundaries of the city. This subsection shall not apply to a redevelopment project involving a formerly used defense site as authorized in section 18-2123.01.

(6) All notices of the provision for dividing ad valorem taxes shall be sent by the authority to the county assessor on forms prescribed by the Property Tax Administrator. The notice shall be sent to the county assessor on or before July 1 of the year of the effective date of the provision. Failure to satisfy the notice requirement of this section shall result in the taxes, for all taxable years affected by the failure to give notice of the effective date of the provision, remaining undivided and being paid into the funds for each public body receiving property taxes generated by the property in the redevelopment project. However, the redevelopment project valuation for the remaining division of ad valorem taxes in accordance with subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section shall be the last certified valuation for the taxable year prior to the effective date of the provision to divide the taxes for the remaining portion of the twenty-year or fifteen-year period pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

Laws 1979, LB 158, § 10;

Laws 1997, LB 875, § 14;

Laws 1999, LB 194, § 2;

Laws 2002, LB 994, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 808, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 1175, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB54, § 1;

Laws 2013, LB66, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB874, § 34;

Laws 2020, LB1021, § 15;

Laws 2021, LB25, § 2;

Laws 2022, LB1065, § 3;

Laws 2023, LB531, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB240, § 1.